Utah statutes.
11-7-4.   Death or injury of fireman while fighting fire outside territorial
limits.
The effect of the death or injury of any fireman who is killed or injured
outside the territorial limits of the county or municipality where he is a
member of the fire-fighting force or fire department and while that force or
department is functioning pursuant to any contract made under Section 11-7-1
shall be the same as if he were killed or injured while that force or
department was functioning within its own territorial limits, and his death
shall be considered in the line of duty.
